Arkansas, session 2025, SB188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-9-107 is amended to read as follows:
7-9-107. Filing of original draft before circulation.
(a) Before any initiative petition or referendum petition ordering a
vote upon any amendment or act shall be circulated for obtaining signatures
of petitioners, the sponsors shall submit the original draft with the
Attorney General.
(b) The original draft shall include:
(1) The full text of the proposed measure;
(2) A ballot title for the proposed measure; and
(3) A popular name for the proposed measure.
(c) The Attorney General shall return to the sponsor a file-marked
copy of the original draft that shall serve as evidence that the original
draft was filed in compliance with this section.
*SSS006*
02-19-2025 11:46:32 SSS006

As Engrossed: S2/19/25 SB188
(d)(1) Within ten (10) business days, the Attorney General shall
approve and certify or shall substitute and certify a more suitable and
correct ballot title and popular name for each amendment or act.
(2) The ballot title so submitted or supplied by the Attorney
General shall briefly and concisely state the purpose of the proposed
measure.
(e)(1) After a proposed measure has been certified by the Attorney
General, within five (5) business days of soliciting or otherwise gathering
signatures for a proposed measure, the sponsor shall provide the following
information to the Secretary of State:
(A) The full text of the proposed measure;
(B) The certified ballot title for the proposed measure;
(C) The certified popular name for the proposed measure;
and
(D) The letter from the Attorney General certifying the
proposed measure.
(2)(A) The Secretary of State shall post the information
provided under subdivision (e)(1)(A)-(C) of this section on the Secretary of
State’s website within five (5) days of receiving the information from the
Attorney General.
(B) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(2)(C) of this
section, the information provided under subdivision (e)(1)(A)-(C) of this
section shall remain on the Secretary of State’s website until the day
following the next general election.
(C) The Secretary of State may remove the information
provided under subdivision (e)(1)(A)-(C) of this section from the Secretary
of State’s website if:
(i) The proposed measure fails to qualify for the
ballot for lack of signatures;
(ii) The sponsor of the proposed measure is not
actively obtaining signatures for the proposed measure and requests that the
Secretary of State remove the information from the Secretary of State’s
website;
(iii) The proposed measure has been removed from the
ballot by:
(a) The Arkansas Supreme Court; or
02-19-2025 11:46:32 SSS006

As Engrossed: S2/19/25 SB188
(b) An Arkansas circuit court and the time for
filing the notice of appeal has expired; or
(iv) The Secretary of State independently determines
that the language submitted by the sponsor does not accurately reflect a
proposed measure certified by the Attorney General or that is actively being
circulated for signatures to the people of Arkansas.
(e)(f) If, as a result of his or her review of the ballot title and
popular name of a proposed initiated act or a proposed amendment to the
Arkansas Constitution, the Attorney General determines that the ballot title
or the nature of the issue, is presented in such manner that the ballot title
would be misleading or designed in such manner that a vote “FOR” the issue
would be a vote against the matter or viewpoint that the voter believes
himself or herself casting a vote for, or, conversely, that a vote “AGAINST”
the issue would be a vote for a viewpoint that the voter is against, the
Attorney General may reject the entire ballot title, popular name, and
petition and state his or her reasons therefor and instruct the petitioners
to redesign the proposed measure and the ballot title and popular name in a
manner that would not be misleading.
(g) If the Secretary of State independently determines that a proposed
measure is actively being circulated for signatures to the people of Arkansas
and the sponsor has not submitted the information required under subdivision
(e)(1) of this section to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State may
obtain the information from the Attorney General and post the information
required under subdivision (e)(1)(A)-(C) of this section on the Secretary of
State’s website.
(h) If the sponsor of a proposed measure fails to comply with this
section, that failure shall not contribute in any way to a determination by
the Secretary of State that the proposed measure, or any individual signature
submitted to the Secretary of State in connection with the proposed measure,
is insufficient for any reason.
(f)(i) If the Attorney General refuses to act or if the sponsors feel
aggrieved at the Attorney General's acts in such premises, the sponsors may,
by petition, apply to the Supreme Court for proper relief.

/s/C. Tucker

02-19-2025 11:46:32 SSS006